Maine, session 132, LD1570.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4003, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. A, §41, is amended
to read:
§4003. Water supply
If a school building of a school administrative unit is supplied by a water supply that
is operated by the school administrative unit and which that serves only the school buildings
under the control of the school board, the water supply is not considered a public water
supply under Title 22, sections section 2651‑B and 2653. The school board shall ensure
that this water supply meets standards set by the Department of Health and Human Services
for private water supplies of schools.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §2651-A, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 463, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §2651-A, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 463, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §2651-A, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 463, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 5. 22 MRSA §2651-A, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 463, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 6. 22 MRSA §2651-A, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. Natural fluoride level. "Natural fluoride level" means the concentration of
fluoride that is present in a water supply from naturally occurring fluoride.
Sec. 7. 22 MRSA §2651-A, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 463, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 8. 22 MRSA §2651-A, sub-§7, as amended by PL 1987, c. 122, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 9. 22 MRSA §2651-A, sub-§8, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 463, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 10. 22 MRSA §2651-A, sub-§9, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 463, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. 11. 22 MRSA §2651-B, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 463, §2, is amended to read:
§2651-B. Fluoridation prohibited; penalty
No A public water system may not add any fluoride to its water supply without written
approval of the department in excess of the natural fluoride level of the water supply. A
person that intentionally violates this section commits a civil violation for which a fine of
$1,000 per day for each day of the violation may be adjudged.
Sec. 12. 22 MRSA §2653, as amended by PL 1987, c. 122, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 13. 22 MRSA §2654, as amended by PL 1991, c. 824, Pt. A, §43, is repealed.
Sec. 14. 22 MRSA §2655, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. B, §131, is repealed.
Sec. 15. 22 MRSA §2656, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. B, §§132 and 133, is
repealed.
Sec. 16. 22 MRSA §2657, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 463, §4, is repealed.
Sec. 17. 22 MRSA §2658, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 463, §4, is repealed.
Page 1 - 132LR1592(01)

Sec. 18. 22 MRSA §2659, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 463, §4, is amended to read:
§2659. Rules
The Department department shall promulgate such adopt rules, pursuant to the Maine
Administrative Procedure Act, Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter II, as 2 it deems considers
necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter, including, but not limited to, rules
regarding the time and manner in which municipalities shall establish public water system
zones.
Sec. 19. Cessation of addition of fluoride; notification to customers. A public
water system that intentionally adds fluoride to its water supply in excess of the natural
fluoride level in violation of the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 2651-B on the
effective date of this Act shall cease adding such fluoride within 90 days of the effective
date of this Act and shall notify its customers of the date of that cessation.